District of Columbia statutes.
50-1801

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Motor vehicle” means an automotive transportation device with more than 3 wheels and a seating capacity of 8 or less passengers, not including the driver, but the term does not include vehicles used for farm purposes.

(2)

“Properly restrained” means strapped around the waist or the torso of a passenger by a safety belt built into the motor vehicle.

Dec. 12, 1985, D.C. Law 6-73, § 2, 32 DCR 6344

History

1981 Ed., § 40-1601.

Prior Codifications

Expiration of Law 6-73

Section 9(b) of D.C. Law 6-73 provided that the act shall expire immediately upon the date that the Secretary of the United States Department of Transportation, or his or her designee, determines to rescind the portion of standard 208 of the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety, promulgated December 25, 1968 (33 Fed. R. 19703; 49 CFR part 571.208), which requires the installation of automatic restraints in new private passenger motor vehicles, unless the secretary’s decision to rescind standard 208 is not based on the enactment or the continued operation of the act.

Expiration of Law